Virginia statutes. Title 17.1. Courts of Record.
Article 1. Establishment; Jurisdiction; etc.

§ 17.1-500.
Establishment of circuit courts.

For the City of Williamsburg and James City County, and every other county in the Commonwealth, and the Cities of Alexandria, Bristol, Buena Vista, Charlottesville, Chesapeake, Colonial Heights, Danville, Fredericksburg, Hampton, Hopewell, Lynchburg, Martinsville, Newport News, Norfolk, Petersburg, Portsmouth, Radford, Richmond, Roanoke, Salem, Staunton, Suffolk, Virginia Beach, Waynesboro and Winchester, there shall be a circuit court, which shall be called the circuit court of such county or city, or county and city, as the case may be. Each city circuit court shall be the sole court of record for the city and have jurisdiction over each suit, motion, prosecution or thing now or heretofore properly pending in the former courts of record of the city and over the records of such courts. Any reference in this Code or in any act of the General Assembly to a corporation, hustings, law and chancery, law and equity, chancery or other court of record of a city shall apply to the circuit court thereof, mutatis mutandis.

History.

1973, c. 544, § 17-116.1; 1974, c. 297; 1981, c. 628; 1983, c. 580; 1991, c. 189; 1998, c. 872; 2006, c. 861.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendment by c. 861 deleted “Clifton Forge” following “Chesapeake” in the first sentence.

Research References.

Friend’s Virginia Pleading and Practice (Matthew Bender). Chapter 1. Courts. § 1.04. Circuit Courts. Friend.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

3B M.J. Certiorari, § 11; 5A M.J. Courts, § 43.

§ 17.1-501.
Judges of circuit courts; selection, powers and duties of chief judges; exercise of appointive powers.

There shall be as many judges of the circuit courts as may be fixed by the General Assembly. The judges of each circuit shall select from their number by majority vote a chief judge of the circuit, who shall serve for the term of two years. In the event such judges cannot agree as to who shall be chief judge, the Chief Justice of the Supreme Court shall act as tie breaker.

The chief judge of the circuit shall ensure that the system of justice in his circuit operates smoothly and efficiently. He shall have authority to assign the work of the circuit among the judges, and in doing so he may consider the nature and categories of the cases to be assigned.

Unless otherwise provided by law, powers of appointment within a circuit shall be exercised by a majority of the judges of the circuit; however, the order of appointment may be signed by the chief judge or that judge’s designee on behalf of the other judges. In case of a tie, the Chief Justice of the Supreme Court shall appoint a circuit judge from another circuit who shall act as tie breaker. Where the power of appointment is to be exercised by a majority of the judges of the Second Judicial Circuit and such appointment is to a local post, board or commission in Accomack or Northampton County, the resident judge or judges of the County of Accomack or Northampton shall exercise such appointment power as if he or they comprise the majority of the judges of the circuit.

No person shall be appointed or reappointed under this section until he has submitted his fingerprints to be used for the conduct of a national criminal records search and a Virginia criminal history records search, submitted to a search of the central registry maintained pursuant to §

63.2-1515

for any founded complaint of child abuse or neglect, and provided a written statement of economic interests on the disclosure form prescribed in §

2.2-3117

. No person with a criminal conviction for a felony shall be appointed as a judge.

History.

1973, c. 544, § 17-116.2; 1976, c. 124; 1994, c. 407; 1998, c. 872; 2004, c. 452; 2005, c. 183; 2018, c. 578.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 452 added subsection D.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 183 added “however, the order of appointment may be signed by the chief judge or that judge’s designee on behalf of the other judges” at the end of the first sentence of subsection C.

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendment by c. 578 added “submitted to a search of the central registry maintained pursuant to §

63.2-1515

for any founded complaint of child abuse or neglect, and provided a written statement of economic interests on the disclosure form prescribed in §

2.2-3117

” at the end of the first sentence in subsection D.

Law Review.

For an article, “Racial Diversity on the Bench:
Beyond Role Models and Public Confidence,” see 57 Wash. & Lee L. Rev. 405 (2000).

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Judge’s authority may not be delegated. —

While the chief judge and, collectively, the judges of a judicial circuit, do possess legal authority to establish rules regarding courthouse security, such power may not be delegated to a circuit court administrator. The chief judge and, collectively, the circuit judges, possess the legal authority to establish a general rule that cellular telephones are permitted in the courthouse. Nonetheless, the sheriff possesses the legal authority to take action in any specific instance in which a cellular telephone causes a disturbance, or otherwise endangers public safety within the courthouse. See opinion of Attorney General to the Honorable William O. Watson, Sheriff, City of Portsmouth, 12-065, 2013 Va. AG LEXIS 48 (7/12/13).

Courthouse security. —

While judges and sheriffs should work together to resolve any issues or concerns about courthouse security, judges retain rule-making authority over courthouse security, and the sheriff is responsible for enforcing the rules and responding to any security threats or disturbances. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Paul W. Higgs, Sheriff, City of Fredericksburg, 13-096, 2013 Va. AG LEXIS 93 (12/3/3).

§ 17.1-502.
(For contingent expiration date see cc. 524 and 542) Administrator of circuit court system.

The Executive Secretary of the Supreme Court shall be the administrator of the circuit court system, which includes the operation and maintenance of a case management system and financial management system and related technology improvements.

Any circuit court clerk may establish and maintain his own case management system, financial management system, or other independent technology using automation or technology improvements provided by a private vendor or the locality. Any data from the clerk’s independent system may be provided directly from such clerk to designated state agencies. The data from the clerk’s independent system may also be provided to designated state agencies through an interface with the technology systems operated by the Executive Secretary.

The Executive Secretary shall provide an electronic interface with his case management system, financial management system, or other technology improvements upon written request of any circuit court clerk. The circuit court clerk and the clerk’s designated application service provider shall comply with the security and data standards established by the Executive Secretary for any such electronic interface. The Executive Secretary shall establish security and data standards for such electronic interfaces on or before June 30, 2013, and such standards shall be consistent with the policies, standards, and guidelines established pursuant to §

2.2-2009

.

The costs of designing, implementing, and maintaining any such interface with the systems of the Executive Secretary shall be the responsibility of the circuit court clerk. Prior to incurring any costs, the Office of the Executive Secretary shall provide the circuit court clerk a written explanation of the options for providing such interfaces and provide the clerk with a proposal for such costs and enter into a written contract with the clerk to provide such services.

The Executive Secretary shall assist the chief judges in the performance of their administrative duties. He may employ such staff and other assistants, from state funds appropriated to him for the purpose, as may be necessary to carry out his duties, and may secure such office space as may be requisite, to be located in an appropriate place to be selected by the Executive Secretary.

History.

1973, c. 544, § 17-116.3; 1998, c. 872; 2009, cc. 793, 858; 2011, c. 715; 2012, c. 234; 2013, c. 422.

Section set out twice.

The section above is effective until amendments by Acts
2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 524 and
542 become effective. For the version of this section as amended by Acts
2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 524 and
542, see the following section, also numbered
§

17.1-502

.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2013, c. 422, cl. 2 provides: “That the clerk of the circuit court shall submit data required by §

19.2-390

in a format acceptable to the Central Criminal Records Exchange.”

Acts
2018, cc. 127 and
584, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of
§

17.1-293.1

of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, shall become effective on July 1, 2019.”

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendments by cc. 793 and 858 are identical, and added the language beginning “which shall include responsibility” at the end of the first sentence, inserted the present second through fifth sentences and substituted “The Executive Secretary” for “He” at the beginning of the sixth sentence.

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendment by c. 715 added the sixth sentence.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendment by c. 234 added the fourth sentence, deleted “not to exceed $104,28” following “Executive Secretary” in the sixth sentence, and inserted “and enter into a written contract with the clerk to provide such services” at the end of the seventh sentence.

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendment by c. 422 rewrote the section.

§ 17.1-502.
(For contingent effective date see cc. 524 and 542) Administrator of circuit court system.

The Executive Secretary of the Supreme Court shall be the administrator of the circuit court system, which includes the operation and maintenance of a case management system and financial management system and related technology improvements.

Any circuit court clerk may establish and maintain his own case management system, financial management system, or other independent technology using automation or technology improvements provided by a private vendor or the locality. Any data from the clerk’s independent system may be provided directly from such clerk to designated state agencies. The data from the clerk’s independent system may also be provided to designated state agencies through an interface with the technology systems operated by the Executive Secretary.

The Executive Secretary shall provide an electronic interface with his case management system, financial management system, or other technology improvements upon written request of any circuit court clerk. The circuit court clerk and the clerk’s designated application service provider shall comply with the security and data standards established by the Executive Secretary for any such electronic interface. The Executive Secretary shall establish security and data standards for such electronic interfaces on or before June 30, 2013, and such standards shall be consistent with the policies, standards, and guidelines established pursuant to §

2.2-2009

.

The costs of designing, implementing, and maintaining any such interface with the systems of the Executive Secretary shall be the responsibility of the circuit court clerk. Prior to incurring any costs, the Office of the Executive Secretary shall provide the circuit court clerk a written explanation of the options for providing such interfaces and provide the clerk with a proposal for such costs and enter into a written contract with the clerk to provide such services.

The Executive Secretary shall assist the chief judges in the performance of their administrative duties. He may employ such staff and other assistants, from state funds appropriated to him for the purpose, as may be necessary to carry out his duties, and may secure such office space as may be requisite, to be located in an appropriate place to be selected by the Executive Secretary.

B1.

If the data from a case management system established under subsection B is not provided to the Executive Secretary of the Supreme Court through an interface, such data shall be provided to the Department of State Police through an interface for purposes of complying with §§

19.2-392.7

,

19.2-392.10

,

19.2-392.11

, and

19.2-392.12

. The parameters of such interface shall be determined by the Department of State Police. The costs of designing, implementing, and maintaining such interface shall be the responsibility of the circuit court clerk.

History.

1973, c. 544, § 17-116.3; 1998, c. 872; 2009, cc. 793, 858; 2011, c. 715; 2012, c. 234; 2013, c. 422; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 524, 542.

Section set out twice.

The section above is set out as amended by Acts
2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 524 and
542. For the version of this section effective until amendments by Acts
2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 524 and
542 become effective, see the preceding section, also numbered
§

17.1-502

.

Editor’s note.

Acts
2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 524 and
542, cl. 4 provides: “That the provisions of
§§

9.1-101

,

9.1-128

,

9.1-134

,

17.1-293.1

,

17.1-502

,

19.2-310.7

, and

19.2-389.3

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, and Chapter 23.2 ( §

19.2-392.5

et seq.) of Title 19.2 of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, shall become effective on the earlier of (i) the first day of the fourth month following notification of the Chair of the Virginia Code Commission and the Chairs of the Senate Committee on the Judiciary and the House Committee for Courts of Justice by the Superintendent of State Police that the Executive Secretary of the Supreme Court of Virginia, the Department of State Police, and any circuit court clerk who maintains a case management system that interfaces with the Department of State Police under subsection B1 of
§

17.1-502

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, have automated systems to exchange information as required by
§§

19.2-392.7

,

19.2-392.10

,

19.2-392.11

, and

19.2-392.12

of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, or (ii) July 1, 2025.”

Acts
2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 524 and
542, cl. 6 provides: “That the Executive Secretary of the Supreme Court of Virginia, the Department of State Police, and any circuit court clerk who maintains a case management system that interfaces with the Department of State Police under subsection B1 of
§

17.1-502

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, shall automate systems to exchange information as required by
§§

19.2-392.7

,

19.2-392.10

,

19.2-392.11

, and

19.2-392.12

of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, not later than July 1, 2025.”

Acts
2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 524 and
542, cl. 10 provides: “That the Executive Secretary of the Supreme Court of Virginia, the Department of State Police, and any circuit court clerk who maintains a case management system that interfaces with the Department of State Police under subsection B1 of
§

17.1-502

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, shall each provide a report to the Virginia State Crime Commission on the progress of implementing automated systems to exchange information as required by
§§

19.2-392.7

,

19.2-392.10

,

19.2-392.11

, and

19.2-392.12

of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, by November 1, 2021, and by November 1 of each year thereafter until the automated systems have been fully implemented.”

Acts
2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 524 and
542, cl. 17 provides: “That the provisions of this act may result in a net increase in periods of imprisonment or commitment. Pursuant to
§ 30-19.1:4 of the Code of Virginia, the estimated amount of the necessary appropriation cannot be determined for periods of imprisonment in state adult correctional facilities; therefore, Chapter 1289 of the Acts of Assembly of 2020 requires the Virginia Criminal Sentencing Commission to assign a minimum fiscal impact of $50,000. Pursuant to
§ 30-19.1:4 of the Code of Virginia, the estimated amount of the necessary appropriation cannot be determined for periods of commitment to the custody of the Department of Juvenile Justice.”

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendments by Sp. Sess. I, cc. 524 and 542, are identical, and added subsection B1. For contingent effective date, see note.

§ 17.1-503.
Rules of practice and procedure; rules not to preclude judges from hearing certain cases.

The Supreme Court may formulate rules of practice and procedure for the circuit courts following consultation with the Chairmen of the House Committee for Courts of Justice and the Senate Committee on the Judiciary and the executive committee of the Judicial Conference of Virginia for courts of record. Such rules, subject to the strict construction of the provisions of §

8.01-4

, which shall be the only rules of practice and procedure in the circuit courts of the Commonwealth, shall be included in the Code of Virginia as provided in §

8.01-3

, subject to revision by the General Assembly.

No rule shall hereafter be promulgated under the limitations of §

8.01-4

, or otherwise which would avoid or preclude the judge before whom an accused is arraigned in criminal cases from hearing all aspects of the case on its merits, or to avoid or preclude any judge in any case who has heard any part of the case on its merits, from hearing the case to its conclusion. However, another judge may hear portions of a case where a judge is required to disqualify himself, in cases in which a mistrial is declared, or in cases which have been reversed on appeal, or in the event of sickness, disability or vacation of the judge. The parties to any suit, action, cause or prosecution may waive the provisions of this section. Such waiver shall be entered of record.

In its rules of practice and procedure for the circuit courts, the Supreme Court shall include rules relating to court decisions on any order of quarantine or isolation issued by the State Health Commissioner pursuant to Article 3.02 (§

32.1-48.05

et seq.) of Chapter 2 of Title 32.1 that shall ensure, to the extent possible, that such hearings are held in a manner that will protect the health and safety of individuals subject to any such order of quarantine or isolation, court personnel, counsels, witnesses, and the general public. The rules shall also provide for expedited reviews by the Court of Appeals of decisions by any circuit court and by the Supreme Court of decisions of the Court of Appeals relating to appeals of any order of quarantine or isolation.

History.

1973, c. 544, § 17-116.4; 1976, c. 212; 1998, c. 872; 2004, cc. 773, 1021; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 489.

Editor’s note.

The Virginia Code Commission authorized the substitution of “the Chairmen of the House Committee for Courts of Justice and the Senate Committee on the Judiciary” for “the chairmen of the House and Senate Courts of Justice Committees” in subsection A. March 10, 2021.

Acts
2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 489, cl. 3 provides: “That any case for which a notice of appeal to the Supreme Court has been filed prior to January 1, 2022, shall continue in the Supreme Court of Virginia and shall not be affected by the provisions of this act.”

Acts
2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 489, cl. 4 provides: “That any case for which a petition for appeal in a criminal case to the Court of Appeals has been filed prior to January 1, 2022, and a decision on such petition remains pending, such petition for appeal shall be deemed granted and the clerk of the Court of Appeals shall certify the granting of such petition to the trial court and all counsel. Such case shall be considered mature for purposes of further proceedings from the date of such certificate.”

Acts
2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 489, cl. 6 provides: “That the provisions of this act amending
§

17.1-400

of the Code of Virginia shall become effective in due course and that the remaining provisions of this act shall become effective on January 1, 2022.”

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendments by cc. 773, effective April 12, 2004, and 1021, effective April 21, 2004, are identical, and inserted the A and B designations at the beginning of the first and next-to-last paragraphs and added subsection C.

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 489, effective January 1, 2022, substituted “Court of Appeals of decisions by any circuit court and by the Supreme Court of decisions of the Court of Appeals” for “Supreme Court of decisions by any circuit court” in subsection C.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

5B M.J. Criminal Procedure, § 2; 11A M.J. Judgments & Decrees, § 119.

§ 17.1-504.
Reserved.

§ 17.1-505.
Circuit court of county to constitute circuit court of certain cities.

The circuit court of any county, within which is situated any city which has undergone transition from a city of the second class to a city of the first class since the Constitution of 1902, went into effect, shall have concurrent jurisdiction with the circuit court of such city in all proceedings at law or in equity, except criminal prosecutions; and the circuit court of such county shall constitute the circuit court of such city. This section shall not apply to the Cities of Bristol, Colonial Heights, Fredericksburg, Martinsville, Salem and Suffolk for which separate circuit courts have heretofore been established and which are continued.

History.

Code 1919, § 5911, § 17-118; 1920, p. 607; 1962, c. 237; 1968, c. 107; 1971, Ex. Sess., c. 27; 1998, c. 872.

§ 17.1-506.
Judicial circuits.

The City of Chesapeake shall constitute the first circuit.

The City of Virginia Beach and the Counties of Accomack and Northampton shall constitute the second circuit.

The City of Portsmouth shall constitute the third circuit.

The City of Norfolk shall constitute the fourth circuit.

The Cities of Franklin and Suffolk and the Counties of Isle of Wight and Southampton shall constitute the fifth circuit.

The Cities of Emporia and Hopewell and the Counties of Brunswick, Greensville, Prince George, Surry and Sussex shall constitute the sixth circuit.

The City of Newport News shall constitute the seventh circuit.

The City of Hampton shall constitute the eighth circuit.

The Cities of Poquoson and Williamsburg and the Counties of Charles City, Gloucester, James City, King and Queen, King William, Mathews, Middlesex, New Kent and York shall constitute the ninth circuit.

The Counties of Appomattox, Buckingham, Charlotte, Cumberland, Halifax, Lunenburg, Mecklenburg and Prince Edward shall constitute the tenth circuit.

The City of Petersburg and the Counties of Amelia, Dinwiddie, Nottoway and Powhatan shall constitute the eleventh circuit.

The City of Colonial Heights and the County of Chesterfield shall constitute the twelfth circuit.

The City of Richmond shall constitute the thirteenth circuit.

The County of Henrico shall constitute the fourteenth circuit.

The City of Fredericksburg and the Counties of Caroline, Essex, Hanover, King George, Lancaster, Northumberland, Richmond, Spotsylvania, Stafford and Westmoreland shall constitute the fifteenth circuit.

The City of Charlottesville and the Counties of Albemarle, Culpeper, Fluvanna, Goochland, Greene, Louisa, Madison and Orange shall constitute the sixteenth circuit.

The County of Arlington and the City of Falls Church shall constitute the seventeenth circuit.

The City of Alexandria shall constitute the eighteenth circuit.

The City of Fairfax and the County of Fairfax shall constitute the nineteenth circuit.

The Counties of Fauquier, Loudoun and Rappahannock shall constitute the twentieth circuit.

The City of Martinsville and the Counties of Henry and Patrick shall constitute the twenty-first circuit.

The City of Danville and the Counties of Franklin and Pittsylvania shall constitute the twenty-second circuit.

The Cities of Roanoke and Salem and the County of Roanoke shall constitute the twenty-third circuit.

The City of Lynchburg and the Counties of Amherst, Bedford, Campbell and Nelson shall constitute the twenty-fourth circuit.

The Cities of Buena Vista, Covington, Lexington, Staunton and Waynesboro and the Counties of Alleghany, Augusta, Bath, Botetourt, Craig, Highland and Rockbridge shall constitute the twenty-fifth circuit.

The Cities of Harrisonburg and Winchester and the Counties of Clarke, Frederick, Page, Rockingham, Shenandoah and Warren shall constitute the twenty-sixth circuit.

The Cities of Galax and Radford and the Counties of Bland, Carroll, Floyd, Giles, Grayson, Montgomery, Pulaski and Wythe shall constitute the twenty-seventh circuit.

The City of Bristol and the Counties of Smyth and Washington shall constitute the twenty-eighth circuit.

The Counties of Buchanan, Dickenson, Russell and Tazewell shall constitute the twenty-ninth circuit.

The City of Norton and the Counties of Lee, Scott and Wise shall constitute the thirtieth circuit.

The Cities of Manassas and Manassas Park and the County of Prince William shall constitute the thirty-first circuit.

History.

1973, c. 544, § 17-119.1:1; 1974, c. 297; 1976, c. 126; 1977, c. 4; 1983, c. 149; 1986, c. 405; 1987, c. 624; 1991, c. 189; 1998, c. 872; 2006, c. 861; 2016, cc. 164, 312.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendment by c. 861 deleted “City of South Boston and the” at the beginning of subdivision 10 and deleted “Clifton Forge” following “Buena Vista” in subdivision 25.

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendments by cc. 164 and 312 are identical, and substituted “City of Lynchburg” for “Cities of Bedford and Lynchburg” in subdivision 24.

§ 17.1-507.
Maximum number of judges; residence requirement; compensation; powers; etc.

For the several judicial circuits there shall be judges, the maximum number as hereinafter set forth, who shall during their service reside within their respective circuits and whose compensation and powers shall be the same as now and hereafter prescribed for circuit judges.

The maximum number of judges of the circuits shall be as follows:First — 5Second — 8Third — 4Fourth — 8Fifth — 4Sixth — 3Seventh — 5Eighth — 3Ninth — 4Tenth — 4Eleventh — 3Twelfth — 6Thirteenth — 7Fourteenth — 5Fifteenth — 11Sixteenth — 6Seventeenth — 4Eighteenth — 3Nineteenth — 15Twentieth — 5Twenty-first — 3Twenty-second — 4Twenty-third — 5Twenty-fourth — 6Twenty-fifth — 6Twenty-sixth — 8Twenty-seventh — 6Twenty-eighth — 4Twenty-ninth — 5Thirtieth — 4Thirty-first — 7

No additional circuit court judge shall be authorized or provided for any judicial circuit until the Judicial Council has made a study of the need for such additional circuit court judge and has reported its findings and recommendations to the House Committee for Courts of Justice and the Senate Committee on the Judiciary. The boundary of any judicial circuit shall not be changed until a study has been made by the Judicial Council and a report of its findings and recommendations made to said Committees.

If the Judicial Council finds the need for an additional circuit court judge after a study is made pursuant to subsection B, the study shall be made available to the Compensation Board and the House Committee for Courts of Justice and the Senate Committee on the Judiciary and Council shall publish notice of such finding in a publication of general circulation among attorneys licensed to practice in the Commonwealth. The Compensation Board shall make a study of the need to provide additional courtroom security and deputy court clerk staffing. This study shall be reported to the House Committee for Courts of Justice and the Senate Committee on the Judiciary, and to the Department of Planning and Budget.

History.

1973, c. 544, § 17-119.1:2; 1974, cc. 42, 43; 1975, c. 40; 1977, c. 4; 1979, c. 6; 1980, c. 29; 1981, c. 27; 1982, c. 57; 1983, c. 2; 1985, c. 43; 1986, cc. 78, 479; 1989, c. 43; 1990, cc. 113, 114; 1991, cc. 20, 419, 623; 1992, c. 92; 1993, cc. 9, 89; 1994, cc. 89, 454; 1995, c. 20; 1996, c. 120; 1997, c. 17; 1998, cc. 3, 872; 1999, cc. 10, 319; 2000, c. 37; 2004, Sp. Sess. I, c. 4; 2005, cc. 190, 231, 951; 2006, cc. 35, 738; 2006, Sp. Sess. I, c. 2; 2013, c. 806; 2014, cc. 812, 822; 2018, cc. 126, 135; 2022, cc. 579, 580.

Twenty-first Judicial Circuit judgeships.

Acts 2014, cc. 812 and 822 reduced the number of Circuit Court judges from 3 to 2. Acts 2014, cc. 812 and 822, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act reducing the number of authorized judgeships in the Twenty-first Judicial Circuit shall become effective upon the death, resignation, or retirement on or after January 1, 2014, of any judge of that court.”

Second circuit judgeships.

Acts 2018, cc. 126 and 135 reduced the number of Circuit Court judges from 9 to 8. Acts 2018, cc. 126 and 135, cl. 2 provided: “That the provisions of this act reducing the number of authorized judgeships in the Second Judicial Circuit shall become effective upon the death, resignation, or retirement on or after January 1, 2018, of any judge of that court.”

Editor’s note.

The Virginia Code Commission authorized the substitution of “the House Committee for Courts of Justice and the Senate Committee on the Judiciary” for “the Courts of Justice Committees of the House of Delegates and Senate” in subsections B and C. March 10, 2021.

The 1999 amendments.

The 1999 amendment by c. 10 deleted, in subsection A, substituted “Fifteenth — 7” for “Fifteenth — 6,” and, in subsection B, deleted the former second sentence, which read: “In its study, the Judicial Council shall consider, and report its findings regarding, the reduced case load that will occur if family court judgeships are authorized in accordance with the provisions of Article 2 (§ 16.1-69.6:1 et seq.) of Chapter 4.1 of Title 16.1” and deleted “Additionally” at the beginning of the present second sentence.

The 1999 amendment by c. 319 inserted “and Council shall publish notice of such finding in a publication of general circulation among attorneys licensed to practice in the Commonwealth” at the end of the first sentence in subsection C.

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendment by c. 37, in subsection A, increased the number of judges in the twelfth and the twenty-seventh circuits from four to five.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 4, as amended by Acts 2005, c. 951, and Acts 2006, Sp. Sess. I, c. 2, effective July 1, 2004, in subsection A, substituted “First — 5” for “First — 4,” “Fourteenth — 5” for “Fourteenth — 4,” “Fifteenth — 8” for “Fifteenth — 7,” “Twenty-second — 4” for “Twenty-second — 3,” and “Twenty-ninth — 4” for “Twenty-ninth — 3.”

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendments by cc. 190 and 231 are identical, and substituted “Twenty-eighth — 3” for “Twenty-eighth — 2.”

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendments by cc. 35 and 738 are identical, and substituted “Third — 5” for “Third — 4” in subsection A.

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendment by c. 806, cl. 7, substituted “Fifteenth — 9” for “Fifteenth — 8” in subsection A.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendment by cc. 812 and 822 are identical, and inserted “maximum” in the first and second paragraphs and rewrote the table.

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendments by cc. 126 and 135 are identical, and in the table of subsection A, decreased the number of judges by one in the second, thirteenth, twenty-second and twenty-seventh judicial districts; and increased the number of judges by one in the fifth, seventh, seventeenth, eighteenth, twenty-first, twenty-fourth, and twenty-fifth judicial districts.

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendments by cc. 579 and 580 are identical, and substituted “7” for “6” in the last paragraph of subsection A.

Law Review.

For survey of Virginia law on pleading and practice for the year 1972-1973, see 59 Va. L. Rev. 1559 (1973).

§ 17.1-508.
Judges in new or changed circuits; ratifying, validating and confirming certain actions.

In any case heretofore or hereafter arising in which a judge has been judge of a circuit created under §

17.1-506

as amended, and the counties and cities, or one or more of them, have been transferred to and constituted as part of a new judicial circuit and the remaining counties and cities constituted as a circuit, the judges of the respective circuits are hereby declared to be judges of said circuits in which they reside and their actions are hereby ratified, validated and confirmed.

History.

1962, c. 3, § 17-119.2; 1978, c. 480; 1998, c. 872.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

11A M.J. Judges, § 3.

§ 17.1-509.
Vacancies in office of judge.

Whenever a vacancy occurs in the office of judge, a successor, who shall be a resident of the same circuit, shall be elected for a full term of eight years and upon qualification shall enter at once upon the discharge of the duties of his office. No person shall be elected or reelected to a subsequent term under this section until he has submitted to a criminal history record search and submitted to a search of the central registry maintained pursuant to §

63.2-1515

for any founded complaint of child abuse or neglect and reports of such searches have been received by the Chairmen of the House Committee for Courts of Justice and the Senate Committee on the Judiciary. If the person has not met the requirement of filing in the preceding calendar year a disclosure form prescribed in §

2.2-3117

or 30-111, he shall also provide a written statement of economic interests on the disclosure form prescribed in §

2.2-3117

to the Chairmen of the House Committee for Courts of Justice and the Senate Committee on the Judiciary. Subject to the provisions of §§

17.1-511

and

17.1-512

, the Governor shall have the power while the General Assembly is not in session to fill pro tempore vacancies in such office. Such appointment to every vacancy shall be by commission to expire at the end of 30 days after the commencement of the next regular session of the General Assembly. No person with a criminal conviction for a felony shall be appointed as a judge.

History.

Code 1919, § 5889, § 17-120; 1920, p. 123; 1924, p. 310; 1944, p. 95; 1971, Ex. Sess., c. 27; 1973, c. 544; 1977, c. 197; 1998, c. 872; 2001, c. 256; 2004, c. 452; 2018, c. 578.

Editor’s note.

The Virginia Code Commission authorized the substitution of “the Chairmen of the House Committee for Courts of Justice and the Senate Committee on the Judiciary” for “the chairmen of the House and Senate Committees for Courts of Justice” in two places. March 10, 2021.

The 2001 amendments.

The 2001 amendment by c. 256 substituted “while the General Assembly is not in session” for “during the recess of the General Assembly.”

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 452 inserted the second sentence, deleted “But” at the beginning of the third sentence, added the last sentence, and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendment by c. 578 substituted “and submitted to a search of the central registry maintained pursuant to §

63.2-1515

for any founded complaint of child abuse or neglect and reports of such searches have been received” for “and a report of such search has been received” in the second sentence, and inserted the third sentence.

Law Review.

For an article, “Racial Diversity on the Bench:
Beyond Role Models and Public Confidence,” see 57 Wash. & Lee L. Rev. 405 (2000).

§ 17.1-510.
Election of judge of new circuit; how court held meanwhile.

If a new or additional circuit is created, a judge or judges shall be elected or appointed thereto in the same manner as provided by law for the filling of vacancies or newly created judgeships in existing circuits.

During any vacancy from the creation of the new circuit until a judge has been elected or appointed to fill the vacancy and has qualified, terms of the court shall be held by a judge or by judges designated as provided by law in cases of vacancies.

History.

Code 1919, § 5889, § 17-121; 1920, p. 123; 1924, p. 310; 1944, p. 95; 1998, c. 872.

Cross references.

For constitutional provision, see Va. Const., Art. VI, § 7.

§ 17.1-511.
Investigation and certification of necessity before vacancies filled.

When a vacancy occurs in the office of judge of any court of record, the vacancy shall not be filled until, after investigation, the Supreme Court certifies that the filling of the vacancy is or is not necessary. If the Court certifies that the filling of the vacancy is necessary, the Court shall publish notice of such certification in a publication of general circulation among attorneys licensed to practice in the Commonwealth. No notice of retirement submitted under §

51.1-305

or §

51.1-307

shall be revoked after certification of the vacancy by the Court. If the Court certifies that the filling of the vacancy is not necessary, it shall recommend to the General Assembly the manner of distributing the work of the judge; and the Governor shall not fill the vacancy.

History.

1940, p. 178, § 17-122; Michie Code 1942, § 5889a; 1944, p. 96; 1962, c. 287; 1973, c. 544; 1998, c. 872; 1999, c. 319; 2004, c. 331.

The 1999 amendment

added the second sentence.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 331 inserted the present third sentence.